Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-748.12
Personal information; limit on use.

Personal information gathered or transmitted under sections 42-748.01 to 42-748.13 may be used only for the purposes for which it was gathered or transmitted.

Laws 2015, LB415, § 59.